Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.070

Secretary immune from liability.

The secretary or individuals acting on his or her behalf are immune from suit in any civil action based on any certification or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 2009 c 560 s 18; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 507; 1991 c 3 s 208; 1987 c 412 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—Disposition of property and funds—Assignment/delegation of contractual rights or duties—2009 c 560: See notes following RCW 18.06.080.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.